Hawaii statutes.
[§196-9] Energy efficiency and
environmental standards for state facilities, motor vehicles, and
transportation fuel. (a) Each agency is directed to implement, to the
extent possible, the following goals during planning and budget preparation and
program implementation.

(b) With regard to buildings and facilities,
each agency shall:

(1) Design and construct buildings meeting the
Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design silver or two green globes rating
system or another comparable state‑approved, nationally recognized, and
consensus‑based guideline, standard, or system, except when the
guideline, standard, or system interferes or conflicts with the use of the
building or facility as an emergency shelter;

(2) Incorporate energy‑efficiency measures to
prevent heat gain in residential facilities up to three stories in height to
provide R-19 or equivalent on roofs, R-11 or equivalent in walls, and
high-performance windows to minimize heat gain and, if air conditioned,
minimize cool air loss. R-value is the constant time rate resistance to heat
flow through a unit area of a body induced by a unit temperature difference
between the surfaces. R-values measure the thermal resistance of building
envelope components such as roof and walls. The higher the R-value, the
greater the resistance to heat flow. Where possible, buildings shall be
oriented to maximize natural ventilation and day-lighting without heat gain and
to optimize solar for water heating. This provision shall apply to new
residential facilities built using any portion of state funds or located on
state lands;

(3) Install solar water heating systems where it is
cost-effective, based on a comparative analysis to determine the cost-benefit
of using a conventional water heating system or a solar water heating system.
The analysis shall be based on the projected life cycle costs to purchase and
operate the water heating system. If the life cycle analysis is positive, the
facility shall incorporate solar water heating. If water heating entirely by
solar is not cost-effective, the analysis shall evaluate the life cycle,
cost-benefit of solar water heating for preheating water. If a multi-story
building is centrally air conditioned, heat recovery shall be employed as the
primary water heating system. Single family residential clients of the
department of Hawaiian home lands and any agency or program that can take
advantage of utility rebates shall be exempted from the requirements of this
paragraph so they may continue to qualify for utility rebates for solar water
heating;

(4) Implement water and energy efficiency practices
in operations to reduce waste and increase conservation;

(5) Incorporate principles of waste minimization and
pollution prevention, such as reducing, revising, and recycling as a standard
operating practice in programs, including programs for waste management in
construction and demolition projects and office paper and packaging recycling
programs;

(6) Use life cycle cost-benefit analysis to purchase
energy efficient equipment such as ENERGY STAR products and use utility rebates
where available to reduce purchase and installation costs; and

(7) Procure environmentally preferable products,
including recycled and recycled-content, bio-based, and other
resource-efficient products and materials.

(c) With regard to motor vehicles and
transportation fuel, each agency shall:

(1) Comply with Title 10, Code of Federal
Regulations, Part 490, Subpart C, "Mandatory State Fleet Program", if
applicable;

(2) Comply with all applicable state laws regarding
vehicle purchases;

(3) Once federal and state vehicle purchase mandates
have been satisfied, purchase the most fuel-efficient vehicles that meet the
needs of their programs; provided that life cycle cost-benefit analysis of
vehicle purchases shall include projected fuel costs;

(4) Purchase alternative fuels and ethanol blended
gasoline when available;

(5) Evaluate a purchase preference for biodiesel
blends, as applicable to agencies with diesel fuel purchases;

(6) Promote efficient operation of vehicles;

(7) Use the most appropriate minimum octane fuel;
provided that vehicles shall use 87-octane fuel unless the owner's manual for
the vehicle states otherwise or the engine experiences knocking or pinging;

(8) Beginning with fiscal year 2005-2006 as the
baseline, collect and maintain, for the life of each vehicle acquired, the
following data:

(A) Vehicle acquisition cost;

(B) United States Environmental Protection
Agency rated fuel economy;

(C) Vehicle fuel configuration, such as
gasoline, diesel, flex-fuel gasoline/E85, and dedicated propane;

(D) Actual in-use vehicle mileage;

(E) Actual in-use vehicle fuel consumption;
and

(F) Actual in-use annual average vehicle fuel
economy; and

(9) Beginning with fiscal year 2005-2006 as the
baseline with respect to each agency that operates a fleet of thirty or more
vehicles, collect and maintain, in addition to the data in paragraph (8), the
following:

(A) Information on the vehicles in the fleet,
including vehicle year, make, model, gross vehicle weight rating, and vehicle
fuel configuration;

(B) Fleet fuel usage, by fuel;

(C) Fleet mileage; and

(D) Overall annual average fleet fuel economy
and average miles per gallon of gasoline and diesel. [L 2006, c 96, §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next